Washington statutes.
RCW 36.83.120

Removal of commissioner.

For neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner of a service district may be removed by the county legislative authority after conducting a hearing. The commissioner must be given a copy of the charges at least ten days prior to the hearing and must have an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel. If a commissioner is removed, a record of the proceedings, together with the charges and findings, must be filed in the office of the county auditor.

[ 1996 c 292 s 5.]